Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB564.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Election" has the same meaning as in KRS 121.015;
(b) "Minimum school term" or "school term" means not less than one hundred
eighty-five (185) days composed of the student attendance days, teacher
professional days, and holidays;
(c) "School calendar" means the document adopted by a local board of education
that establishes the minimum school term, student instructional year or
variable student instructional year, and days that school will not be in session;
(d) "School district calendar committee" means a committee that includes at least
the following:
1. One (1) school district principal;
2. One (1) school district office administrator other than the
superintendent;
3. One (1) member of the local board of education;
4. Two (2) parents of students attending a school in the district;
5. One (1) school district elementary school teacher;
6. One (1) school district middle or high school teacher;
7. Two (2) school district classified employees; and
8. Two (2) community members from the local chamber of commerce,
business community, or tourism commission;
(e) "Student attendance day" means any day that students are scheduled to be at
school to receive instruction, and encompasses the designated start and
dismissal time;
(f) "Student instructional year" means at least one thousand sixty-two (1,062)
Page 1 of 11
XXXX 12/4/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1009
hours of instructional time for students delivered on not less than one hundred
seventy (170) student attendance days;
(g) "Teacher professional day" means any day teachers are required to report to
work as determined by a local board of education, with or without the
presence of students; and
(h) "Variable student instructional year" means at least one thousand sixty-two
(1,062) hours of instructional time delivered on the number of student
attendance days adopted by a local board of education which shall be
considered proportionally equivalent to one hundred seventy (170) student
attendance days and calendar days for the purposes of a student instructional
year, employment contracts that are based on the school term, service credit
under KRS 161.500, and funding under KRS 157.350.
(2) (a) The local board of education, upon recommendation of the local school
district superintendent, shall annually appoint a school district calendar
committee to review, develop, and recommend school calendar options.
(b) The school district calendar committee, after seeking feedback from school
district employees, parents, and community members, shall recommend
school calendar options to the local school district superintendent for
presentation to the local board of education. The committee's
recommendations shall comply with state laws and regulations and consider
the economic impact of the school calendar on the community and the state.
(c) Prior to adopting a school calendar, the local board of education shall hear for
discussion the school district calendar committee's recommendations and the
recommendation of the superintendent at a meeting of the local board of
education.
(d) During a subsequent meeting of the local board of education, the local board
shall adopt a school calendar for the upcoming school year that establishes the
Page 2 of 11
XXXX 12/4/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1009
opening and closing dates of the school term, beginning and ending dates of
each school month, student attendance days, and days on which schools shall
be dismissed. The local board may schedule days for breaks in the school
calendar that shall not be counted as a part of the minimum school term.
(e) For local board of education meetings described in paragraphs (c) and (d) of
this subsection, if the meeting is a regular meeting, notice shall be given to
media outlets that have requests on file to be notified of special meetings
stating the date of the regular meeting and that one (1) of the items to be
considered in the regular meeting will be the school calendar. The notice shall
be sent at least twenty-four (24) hours before the regular meeting. This
requirement shall not be deemed to make any requirements or limitations
relating to special meetings applicable to the regular meeting.
(f) A local school board of education that adopts a school calendar with the first
student attendance day in the school term starting no earlier than the Monday
closest to August 26 may use a variable student instructional year. Districts
may set the length of individual student attendance days in a variable student
instructional schedule, but no student attendance day shall contain more than
seven (7) hours of instructional time unless the district submitted and received
approval from the commissioner of education for an innovative alternative
calendar.
(3) (a) Each local board of education shall use four (4) days of the minimum school
term for professional development and collegial planning activities for the
professional staff without the presence of students pursuant to the
requirements of KRS 156.095. At the discretion of the superintendent, one (1)
day of professional development may be used for district-wide activities and
for training that is mandated by federal or state law. The use of three (3) days
shall be planned by each school council, except that the district is encouraged
Page 3 of 11
XXXX 12/4/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1009
to provide technical assistance and leadership to school councils to maximize
existing resources and to encourage shared planning.
(b) A teacher or other certified personnel within a school required to participate
in professional development activities outside the days scheduled in the
school calendar or the regularly scheduled hours in the school work day
shall be compensated at no less than the hourly equivalent of his or her rate
of pay.
(c) 1. A local board may approve a school's flexible professional development
plan that permits teachers or other certified personnel within a school to
participate in professional development activities outside the days
scheduled in the school calendar or the regularly scheduled hours in the
school work day and receive credit towards the four (4) day professional
development requirement within the minimum one hundred eighty-five
(185) days that a teacher shall be employed.
2. A flexible schedule option shall be reflected in the school's professional
development component within the school improvement plan and
approved by the local board. Credit for approved professional
development activities may be accumulated in periods of time other than
full day segments.
3. No teacher or administrator shall be permitted to count participation in a
professional development activity under the flexible schedule option
unless the activity is related to the teacher's classroom assignment and
content area, or the administrator's job requirements, or is required by
the school improvement plan, or is tied to the teacher's or the
administrator's individual growth plan. The supervisor shall give prior
approval and shall monitor compliance with the requirements of this
paragraph. In the case of teachers, a professional development
Page 4 of 11
XXXX 12/4/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1009
committee or the school council by council policy may be responsible
for reviewing requests for approval.
(d)[(c)] The local board of each school district may use up to a maximum of four
(4) days of the minimum school term for holidays; provided, however, any
holiday which occurs on Saturday may be observed on the preceding Friday.
(e)[(d)] Each local board may use two (2) days for planning activities without
the presence of students.
(f)[(e)] Each local board may close schools for the number of days deemed
necessary for:
1. National or state emergency or mourning when proclaimed by the
President of the United States or the Governor of the Commonwealth of
Kentucky;
2. Local emergency which would endanger the health or safety of children;
and
3. Mourning when so designated by the local board of education and
approved by the Kentucky Board of Education upon recommendation of
the commissioner of education.
(4) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon recommendation of the
commissioner of education, shall adopt administrative regulations governing
the use of student attendance days as a result of a local emergency, as
described in subsection (3)(f)2.[(3)(e)2.] of this section, and regulations
setting forth the guidelines and procedures to be observed for the approval of
waivers from the requirements of a student instructional year in subsection
(1)(f) of this section for districts that wish to adopt innovative instructional
calendars, or for circumstances that would create extreme hardship.
(b) If a local board of education amends its school calendar after its adoption due
to an emergency, it may lengthen or shorten any remaining student attendance
Page 5 of 11
XXXX 12/4/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1009
days by thirty (30) minutes or more, as it deems necessary, provided the
amended calendar complies with the requirements of a student instructional
year in subsection (1)(f) of this section or a variable student instructional year
in subsection (1)(h) of this section. No student attendance day shall contain
more than seven (7) hours of instructional time unless the district submitted
and received approval from the commissioner of education for an innovative
alternative calendar.
(5) (a) 1. In setting the school calendar, school may be closed for two (2)
consecutive days for the purpose of permitting professional school
employees to attend statewide professional meetings.
2. These two (2) days for statewide professional meetings may be
scheduled to begin with the first Thursday after Easter, or upon request
of the statewide professional education association having the largest
paid membership, the commissioner of education may designate
alternate dates.
3. If schools are scheduled to operate during days designated for the
statewide professional meeting, the school district shall permit
employees who are delegates to attend as compensated professional
leave time and shall employ substitute teachers in their absence.
4. The commissioner of education shall designate one (1) additional day
during the school year when schools may be closed to permit
professional school employees to participate in regional or district
professional meetings.
5. These three (3) days so designated for attendance at professional
meetings may be counted as a part of the minimum school term.
(b) If any school in a district is used as a voting place pursuant to KRS 117.065,
the school district may be closed on the days of the election, and those days
Page 6 of 11
XXXX 12/4/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1009
may be used for professional development activities, professional meetings, or
parent-teacher conferences.
(c) All schools shall be closed on the third Monday of January in observance of
the birthday of Martin Luther King, Jr. Districts may:
1. Designate the day as one (1) of the four (4) holidays permitted under
subsection (3)(d)[(3)(c)] of this section; or
2. Not include the day in the minimum school term specified in subsection
(1) of this section.
(6) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education, or the organization or agency designated
by the board to manage interscholastic athletics, shall be encouraged to
schedule athletic competitions outside the regularly scheduled student
attendance day.
(b) Any member of a school-sponsored interscholastic athletic team who
competes in a regional tournament or state tournament sanctioned by the
Kentucky Board of Education, or the organization or agency designated by the
board to manage interscholastic athletics, and occurring on a regularly
scheduled student attendance day may be counted present at school on the
date or dates of the competition, as determined by local board policy, for a
maximum of two (2) days per student per year. The student shall be expected
to complete any assignments missed on the date or dates of the competition.
(c) The school attendance record of any student for whom paragraph (b) of this
subsection applies shall indicate that the student was in attendance on the date
or dates of competition.
(7) Schools shall provide continuing education for those students who are determined
to need additional time to achieve the outcomes defined in KRS 158.6451, and
schools shall not be limited to the minimum school term in providing this
education. Continuing education time may include extended days, extended weeks,
Page 7 of 11
XXXX 12/4/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1009
or extended years. A local board of education may adopt a policy requiring its
students to participate in continuing education. The local policy shall set out the
conditions under which attendance will be required and any exceptions which are
provided. The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative
regulations establishing criteria for the allotment of grants to local school districts
and shall include criteria by which the commissioner of education may approve a
district's request for a waiver under KRS 156.161 to use an alternative service
delivery option, including providing services during the student attendance day on a
limited basis. These grants shall be allotted to school districts to provide
instructional programs for pupils who are identified as needing additional time to
achieve the outcomes defined in KRS 158.6451. A school district that has a school
operating a model early reading program under KRS 158.792 may use a portion of
its grant money as part of the matching funds to provide individualized or small
group reading instruction to qualified students outside of the regular classroom
during the student attendance day.
(8) Notwithstanding any other statute, each school term shall include no less than the
equivalent of the student instructional year in subsection (1)(f) of this section, or a
variable student instructional year in subsection (1)(h) of this section, except that
the commissioner of education may grant up to the equivalent of ten (10) student
attendance days for school districts that have a nontraditional instruction plan
approved by the commissioner of education on days when the school district is
closed for health or safety reasons. The district's plan shall indicate how the
nontraditional instruction process shall be a continuation of learning that is
occurring on regular student attendance days. Instructional delivery methods,
including the use of technology, shall be clearly delineated in the plan. Average
daily attendance for purposes of Support Education Excellence in Kentucky
program funding during the student attendance days granted shall be calculated in
Page 8 of 11
XXXX 12/4/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1009
compliance with administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of
Education.
(9) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to
prescribe the conditions and procedures for districts to be approved for the
nontraditional instruction program. Administrative regulations promulgated by the
board under this section shall specify:
(a) The application, plan review, approval, and amendment process;
(b) Reporting requirements for districts approved for the program, which may
include but are not limited to examples of student work, lesson plans, teacher
work logs, and student and teacher participation on nontraditional instruction
days. Documentation to support the use of nontraditional instruction days
shall include clear evidence of learning continuation;
(c) Timelines for initial approval as a nontraditional instruction district, length of
approval, the renewal process, and ongoing evaluative procedures required of
the district;
(d) Reporting and oversight responsibilities of the district and the Kentucky
Department of Education, including the documentation required to show clear
evidence of learning continuation during nontraditional instruction days; and
(e) Other components deemed necessary to implement this section.
(10) Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 158.060(4) and the provisions of subsection
(2) of this section, a school district shall arrange bus schedules so that all buses
arrive in sufficient time to provide breakfast prior to the beginning of the student
attendance day. The superintendent of a school district that participates in the
Federal School Breakfast Program may also authorize up to fifteen (15) minutes of
the student attendance day to provide the opportunity for children to eat breakfast
during instructional time.
(11) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, the following provisions shall
Page 9 of 11
XXXX 12/4/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1009
apply to a school district that misses student attendance days due to emergencies,
including weather-related emergencies:
(a) A certified school employee shall be considered to have fulfilled the
minimum one hundred eighty-five (185) day contract with a school district
under KRS 157.350 and shall be given credit for the purpose of calculating
service credit for retirement under KRS 161.500 for certified school personnel
if:
1. State and local requirements under this section are met regarding the
equivalent of the number and length of student attendance days, teacher
professional days, professional development days, holidays, and days
for planning activities without the presence of students; and
2. The provisions of the district's school calendar to make up student
attendance days missed due to any emergency, as approved by the
Kentucky Department of Education when required, including but not
limited to a provision for additional instructional time per day, are met.
(b) Additional time worked by a classified school employee shall be considered
as equivalent time to be applied toward the employee's contract and
calculation of service credit for classified employees under KRS 78.615 if:
1. The employee works for a school district with a school calendar
approved by the Kentucky Department of Education that contains a
provision that additional instructional time per day shall be used to make
up full days missed due to an emergency;
2. The employee's contract requires a minimum six (6) hour work day; and
3. The employee's job responsibilities and work day are extended when the
instructional time is extended for the purposes of making up time.
(c) Classified employees who are regularly scheduled to work less than six (6)
hours per day and who do not have additional work responsibilities as a result
Page 10 of 11
XXXX 12/4/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1009
of lengthened student attendance days shall be excluded from the provisions
of this subsection. These employees may be assigned additional work
responsibilities to make up service credit under KRS 78.615 that would be
lost due to lengthened student attendance days.
Page 11 of 11
XXXX 12/4/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed